test/src/morphology/N-vaqit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vaʼit: # Noun 128 'eng /est vahe/fin' - full paradigm
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Nom: vaʼit
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Gen: vaʼit
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Par: vaʼitõ
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Dat: vaʼitõn
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Ins: vaʼitõks
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Ill: vaʼitõ
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Ela: vaʼitstõ
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Nom: vaʼitõd
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Gen: vaʼitõd
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Par: vaʼitidi
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Dat: vaʼitõdõn
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Ins: vaʼitõdõks
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Ill: vaʼitiž
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Ela: vaʼitist
